Nevada, session 83, AB267.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 218A of NRS is hereby amended by
adding thereto a new section to read as follows:
On or before March 1 of each year, the Director shall publish,
for the previous calendar year, the annual salary, including,
without limitation, compensation for overtime, of:
1. The Secretary of the Senate;
2. Each employee of the Senate;
3. The Chief Clerk of the Assembly; and
4. Each employee of the Assembly.
Sec. 2. NRS 218A.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
218A.150 1. The Legislative Fund is hereby created as a
special revenue fund for the use of the Legislature, and where
specifically authorized by law, for the use of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau.
2. Support for the Legislative Fund must be provided by
legislative appropriation from the State General Fund. Money in the
Legislative Fund does not revert to the State General Fund at the
end of the fiscal year, and the balance in the Legislative Fund must
be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
3. Expenditures from the Legislative Fund may be made for:
(a) The payment of necessary expenses of the Senate;
(b) The payment of necessary expenses of the Assembly;
(c) The payment of necessary improvements to the Legislative
Building, other buildings used by the Legislature and all legislative
grounds;
(d) The payment of expenses for the interim operation of the
Legislature; and
(e) The payment of necessary expenses of, but not limited to:
(1) The Legislative Commission;
(2) The Legal Division;
(3) The Research Division;
(4) The Audit Division;
(5) The Fiscal Analysis Division; and
(6) The Administrative Division.
4. Expenditures from the Legislative Fund for purposes other
than those specified in subsection 3 or authorized specifically by
another statute may be made only upon the authority of a concurrent
resolution.
5. All money in the Legislative Fund must be paid out on
claims approved by the Director or the Director’s designee.
6. The Director shall publish, for each fiscal year:
-
*AB267*

– 3 –
(a) A detailed, line-item budget of the Legislature and the
Legislative Counsel Bureau; and
(b) The ending balance of the Legislative Fund and all
accounts in the Legislative Fund.
Sec. 3. Chapter 218F of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
On or before March 1 of each year, the Director shall publish,
for the previous calendar year, the annual salary, including,
without limitation, compensation for overtime, of each employee
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau.
H
-
*AB267*